Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,101
Qualified trustee; requirements.

Any Federal Reserve Bank, branch of a Federal Reserve Bank, a federal home loan bank, or another responsible bank which is authorized to exercise trust powers, capital stock financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers, or qualifying mutual financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers, including a bank which is authorized to exercise trust powers, capital stock financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers, or qualifying mutual financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers chartered by a foreign state agency as defined in subdivision (14) of section 8-101.03, or trust company, other than the pledgor or the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution providing the deposit guaranty bond or granting the security interest, is qualified to act as a qualified trustee for the receipt of a deposit guaranty bond or the holding of securities under section 77-23,100. The bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution in which public money or public funds are deposited may at any time substitute, exchange, or release securities deposited with a qualified trustee if such substitution, exchange, or release does not reduce the aggregate market value of the pool of securities to an amount that is less than one hundred two percent of the total amount of public money or public funds less the portion of such public money or public funds insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution in which public money or public funds are deposited may at any time reduce the amount of the deposit guaranty bond if the reduction does not reduce the total combined value of the deposit guaranty bond and the aggregate market value of the pool of securities to an amount less than one hundred two percent of the total amount of public money or public funds less the portion of such public money or public funds insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 46;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 95;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 33;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 12;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 8.